Mississippi, session 2026, HB1502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  In addition to other provisions of law governing the Mississippi Multimodal Transportation Improvement Program (MTIP) and the Ports Grant Program under Section 57-1-731, Mississippi Code of 1972, the Department of Transportation and the Mississippi Development Authority shall develop and administer a Municipal Port Assistance Program for municipalities with populations under ten thousand (10,000) that operate port facilities. SECTION 2.  Within the Multimodal Transportation Improvement Program and Ports Grant Program, a priority allocation or set-aside shall be established to support capital improvements, preconstruction engineering, planning, design, and infrastructure upgrades at eligible municipal ports, provided that: (a) The municipality demonstrates a port infrastructure need related to economic development, freight movement, or public safety; (b)  Funds shall be used exclusively for capital project costs and not for routine maintenance; (c) Port projects may include roadway access, dock improvements, bulkhead work, utilities, and multimodal freight connections; and (d) Matching requirements may be waived or reduced for eligible municipalities under 10,000 in population. SECTION 3.  The Mississippi Department of Transportation and Mississippi Development Authority, jointly or separately, shall promulgate rules and guidelines necessary to administer the Municipal Port Assistance Program, including criteria, reporting requirements, and compliance expectations. SECTION 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.